Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-3401 to 44-3408 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Life, Sickness and Accident Insurance Policy Readability Act.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 1.